North Dakota, session 69, HB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-03-28. Health insurance mandated coverage of services - Cost-benefit analysis
requirement.
1. If the legislative management determines a legislative measure mandates health insurance
coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services, the measure may not be
referred to a committee of the legislative assembly unless a cost-benefit analysis provided by
the legislative management is appended to that measure.
a. If a committee of the legislative assembly determines a measure mandating health
insurance coverage of services or payment of specified providers was referred to
committee without a cost-benefit analysis, the committee shall request the legislative
management provide a cost-benefit analysis. The committee may not act on the measure
unless the measure is accompanied by the cost-benefit analysis.
b. If a committee of the legislative assembly determines a proposed amendment to a
measure mandates health insurance coverage of services or payment of specified
providers, the committee may not act on the proposed amendment unless the
amendment is accompanied by a cost-benefit analysis or amended cost-benefit analysis
provided by the legislative management.
2. Factors considered in the cost-benefit analysis must include:
a. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the cost of the
service.
b. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase the appropriate use of the
service.
c. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the
administrative expenses of insurers and the premium and administrative expenses of
insureds.
d. The impact of the proposed mandate on the total cost of health care.
3. AThe legislative management shall adopt a procedure for identifying measures and proposed
measures mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers
of services. The procedure must include solicitation of draft measures and proposals during
the interim between legislative sessions from legislators and agencies with bill introduction
privileges and must include deadlines for identification of the measures or proposals.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3, a committee of the legislative assembly may not act on a
legislative measure that the legislative management or committee determines mandates

H. B. NO. 1248 - PAGE 2
health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services unless
the measure as recommended by the committee provides:
a. The measure is effective through June thirtieth of the next odd-numbered year following
the year in which the legislative assembly enacted the measure, and after that date the
measure is ineffective.
b. The application of the mandate is limited to the public employees health insurance
program and the public employee retiree health insurance program. The application of
suchthe mandate begins with every contract for health insurance which becomes
effective after June thirtieth of the year in which the measure becomes effective.
c. That for the next legislative assembly, the public employees retirement system shall
prepare and request introduction of a bill to repeal the expiration date and to extend the
mandated coverage or payment to apply to accident and health insurance policies. The
public employees retirement system shall append to the billprovide to the employee
benefits programs committee a report regarding the effect of the mandated coverage or
payment on the system's health insurance programs. The report must include information
on the utilization and costs relating to the mandated coverage or payment and a
recommendation on whether the coverage or payment should continue for the system's
health insurance programs. For purposes of this section, the bill is not a legislative
measure mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified
providers of services, unless the bill is amended following introduction so as to change
the bill's mandate.
4. The legislative management shall adopt a procedure for identifying measures and proposed
measures mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers
of services. The procedure must include solicitation of draft measures and proposals during
the interim between legislative sessions from legislators and agencies with bill introduction
privileges and must include deadlines for identification of the measures or proposals.
3. If the legislative management determines a legislative measure mandating health insurance
coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services has completed the
process under subsection 2, the measure may not be referred to a committee of the legislative
assembly unless a cost-benefit analysis provided by the legislative management is appended
to the measure.
a. If a committee of the legislative assembly determines a measure or a proposed
amendment to the measure mandating health insurance coverage of services or
payment of specified providers of services was referred to committee without a cost-
benefit analysis, the committee shall request the legislative management provide a cost-
benefit analysis.
b. The committee may not act on the measure unless the measure is accompanied by the
cost-benefit analysis.
4. Factors considered in the cost-benefit analysis must include:
a. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the cost of the
service.
b. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase the appropriate use of the
service.
c. The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the
administrative expenses of insurers and the premium and administrative expenses of
insureds.

H. B. NO. 1248 - PAGE 3
d. The impact of the proposed mandate on the total cost of health care.
5. The legislative council shall contract with a private entity, after receiving one or more
recommendations from the insurance commissioner, to provide the legislative management
the cost-benefit analysis required by this section. The insurance commissioner shall pay the
cost of the contracted services to the entity providing the services.

H. B. NO. 1248 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1248.
House Vote: Yeas 94 Nays 0 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State